Illinois, session 104th, HB5320.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527-1020 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-1020)  (was 105 ILCS 5/27-17)7    Sec. 27-1020. Safety education. School boards of public 8schools and all boards in charge of educational institutions 9supported wholly or partially by the State may provide 10instruction in safety education in all grades and include such 11instruction in the courses of study regularly taught therein.12    In this Section, "safety education" means and includes 13instruction in the following:14        1. automobile safety, including traffic regulations, 15    highway safety, and the consequences of alcohol 16    consumption and the operation of a motor vehicle;17        2. safety in the home, including safe gun storage;18        3. safety in connection with recreational activities;19        4. safety in and around school buildings; 20        5. safety in connection with vocational work or 21    training;22        6. cardio-pulmonary resuscitation for students 23    enrolled in grades 9 through 11;  HB5320- 2 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1        7. for students enrolled in grades 6 through 8, 2    cardio-pulmonary resuscitation and how to use an automated 3    external defibrillator by watching a training video on 4    those subjects; and5        8. for students enrolled in prekindergarten through 6    grade 6, water safety that incorporates evidence-based 7    water safety instructional materials and resources; and.8        9. for students enrolled in grades 6 through 12, the 9    risks of firearm ownership and usage.10    The instruction on the risks of firearm ownership and 11usage shall include information on the impacts of firearm 12violence on youth and the risks to firearm owners and other 13household members posed by firearm ownership and use, 14including risks for suicide, homicide, intimate partner 15homicide, and accidental firearm deaths and injuries. This 16instruction may be taught by a licensed educator, school 17nurse, or school counselor. A student shall be evaluated on 18the student's knowledge of the risks of firearm ownership and 19use before the instruction to allow the school and the State 20Board of Education to measure efficacy. The State Board, in 21consultation with the Department of Public Health, the 22Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Human 23Services, and nonprofits and experts in gun violence 24prevention and trauma-informed education, shall develop an 25age-appropriate, trauma-informed curriculum for this 26instruction.  HB5320- 3 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1(Source: P.A. 103-567, eff. 12-8-23; 104-391, eff. 8-15-25.) 2    Section 10. The School Safety Drill Act is amended by 3changing Section 20 as follows: 4    (105 ILCS 128/20)5    Sec. 20. Number of drills; incidents covered; local 6authority participation. 7    (a) During each academic year, schools must conduct a 8minimum of 3 school evacuation drills to address and prepare 9students and school personnel for fire incidents. These drills 10must meet all of the following criteria:11        (1) One of the 3 school evacuation drills shall 12    require the participation of the appropriate local fire 13    department or district.14            (A) Each local fire department or fire district 15        must contact the appropriate school administrator or 16        his or her designee no later than September 1 of each 17        year in order to arrange for the participation of the 18        department or district in the school evacuation drill.19            (B) Each school administrator or his or her 20        designee must contact the responding local fire 21        official no later than September 15 of each year and 22        propose to the local fire official 4 dates within the 23        month of October, during at least 2 different weeks of 24        October, on which the drill shall occur. The fire   HB5320- 4 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1        official may choose any of the 4 available dates, and 2        if he or she does so, the drill shall occur on that 3        date.4            (C) The school administrator or his or her 5        designee and the local fire official may also, by 6        mutual agreement, set any other date for the drill, 7        including a date outside of the month of October.8            (D) If the fire official does not select one of the 9        4 offered dates in October or set another date by 10        mutual agreement, the requirement that the school 11        include the local fire service in one of its mandatory 12        school evacuation drills shall be waived. Schools, 13        however, shall continue to be strongly encouraged to 14        include the fire service in a school evacuation drill 15        at a mutually agreed-upon time.16            (E) Upon the participation of the local fire 17        service, the appropriate local fire official shall 18        certify that the school evacuation drill was 19        conducted.20            (F) When scheduling the school evacuation drill, 21        the school administrator or his or her designee and 22        the local fire department or fire district may, by 23        mutual agreement on or before September 14, choose to 24        waive the provisions of subparagraphs (B), (C), and 25        (D) of this paragraph (1).26        Additional school evacuation drills for fire incidents   HB5320- 5 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1    may involve the participation of the appropriate local 2    fire department or district.3        (2) Schools may conduct additional school evacuation 4    drills to account for other evacuation incidents, 5    including without limitation suspicious items or bomb 6    threats.7        (3) All drills shall be conducted at each school 8    building that houses school children.9    (b) During each academic year, schools must conduct a 10minimum of one bus evacuation drill. This drill shall be 11accounted for in the curriculum in all public schools and in 12all other educational institutions in this State that are 13supported or maintained, in whole or in part, by public funds 14and that provide instruction in any of the grades kindergarten 15through 12. This curriculum shall include instruction in safe 16bus riding practices for all students. Schools may conduct 17additional bus evacuation drills. All drills shall be 18conducted at each school building that houses school children.19    (b-5) Notwithstanding the minimum requirements established 20by this Act, private schools that do not utilize a bus to 21transport students for any purpose are exempt from subsection 22(b) of this Section, provided that the chief school 23administrator of the private school provides written assurance 24to the State Board of Education that the private school does 25not plan to utilize a bus to transport students for any purpose 26during the current academic year. The assurance must be made   HB5320- 6 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1on a form supplied by the State Board of Education and filed no 2later than October 15. If a private school utilizes a bus to 3transport students for any purpose during an academic year 4when an assurance pursuant to this subsection (b-5) has been 5filed with the State Board of Education, the private school 6shall immediately notify the State Board of Education and 7comply with subsection (b) of this Section no later than 30 8calendar days after utilization of the bus to transport 9students, except that, at the discretion of the private 10school, students chosen for participation in the bus 11evacuation drill need include only the subgroup of students 12that are utilizing bus transportation. 13    (c) During each academic year, schools must conduct a law 14enforcement lockdown drill to address a school shooting 15incident. No later than 90 days after the first day of each 16school year, schools must conduct at least one law enforcement 17lockdown drill that addresses an active threat or an active 18shooter within a school building. Such drills must be 19conducted according to the school district's or private 20school's emergency and crisis response plans, protocols, and 21procedures to evaluate the preparedness of school personnel 22and students. Law enforcement lockdown drills must be 23conducted on days and times when students are normally present 24in the school building and must involve participation from all 25school personnel and students present at school at the time of 26the lockdown drill, except that administrators or school   HB5320- 7 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1support personnel in their discretion may exempt students from 2the lockdown drill. The appropriate local law enforcement 3agency shall observe the administration of the lockdown drill. 4All drills must be conducted at each school building that 5houses school children. 6        (1) A law enforcement lockdown drill must meet all of 7    the following criteria:8            (A) During each calendar year, the appropriate 9        local law enforcement agency shall contact the 10        appropriate school administrator to request to 11        participate in a law enforcement lockdown drill. The 12        school administrator and local law enforcement agency 13        shall set, by mutual agreement, a date for the 14        lockdown drill.15            (A-5) The lockdown drill shall require the on-site 16        participation of the local law enforcement agency. If 17        a mutually agreeable date cannot be reached between 18        the school administrator and the appropriate local law 19        enforcement agency, then the school shall still hold 20        the lockdown drill without participation from the 21        agency.22            (B) Upon the participation of a local law 23        enforcement agency in a law enforcement lockdown 24        drill, the appropriate local law enforcement official 25        shall certify that the law enforcement lockdown drill 26        was conducted and notify the school in a timely manner   HB5320- 8 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1        of any deficiencies noted during the drill.2            (C) The lockdown drill must not include 3        simulations that mimic an actual school shooting 4        incident or active shooter event.5            (D) All lockdown drills must be announced in 6        advance to all school personnel and students prior to 7        the commencement of the drill.8            (E) Lockdown drill content must be age appropriate 9        and developmentally appropriate.10            (F) Lockdown drills must include and involve 11        school personnel, including school-based mental health 12        professionals.13            (G) Lockdown drills must include trauma-informed 14        approaches to address the concerns and well-being of 15        students and school personnel.16        (2) Schools may conduct additional law enforcement 17    drills at their discretion.18        (3) (Blank).19        (4) School administrators and school support personnel 20    may, in their discretion, exempt a student or students 21    from participating in a walk-through lockdown drill. When 22    deciding whether to exempt a student from participating in 23    a walk-through lockdown drill, the administrator and 24    school support personnel shall include the student's 25    individualized education program team or federal Section 26    504 plan team in the decision to exempt the student from   HB5320- 9 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1    participating. 2        (5) Schools must provide sufficient information and 3    notification to parents and guardians in advance of any 4    walk-through lockdown drill that involves the 5    participation of students. Schools must also provide to 6    parents and guardians an opportunity to exempt their child 7    for any reason from participating in the walk-through 8    lockdown drill. 9        (6) Schools must provide alternative safety education 10    and instruction related to an active threat or active 11    shooter event to students who do not participate in a 12    walk-through lockdown drill to provide them with essential 13    information, training, and instruction through less 14    sensorial safety training methods. 15        (7) During the drill, students must be allowed to ask 16    questions related to the drill. 17        (8) Law enforcement may choose to run an active 18    shooter simulation, including simulated gun fire drills, 19    but only on school days when students are not present. 20    Parental notification is not required for drills conducted 21    pursuant to this paragraph (8) if students are not 22    required to be present. 23        (9) Schools must provide, after a lockdown drill has 24    been completed, a forum for trauma-informed discussion 25    with students, parents, and staff regarding any mental 26    health concerns that the impact of the lockdown drill has   HB5320- 10 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1    had on students. 2    (d) During each academic year, schools must conduct a 3minimum of one severe weather and shelter-in-place drill to 4address and prepare students and school personnel for possible 5tornado incidents and may conduct additional severe weather 6and shelter-in-place drills to account for other incidents, 7including without limitation earthquakes or hazardous 8materials. All drills shall be conducted at each school 9building that houses school children.10(Source: P.A. 102-395, eff. 8-16-21; 103-197, eff. 1-1-24.) 11    Section 15. The Firearm Dealer License Certification Act 12is amended by changing Section 5-20 as follows: 13    (430 ILCS 68/5-20)14    Sec. 5-20. Additional licensee requirements. 15    (a) A certified licensee shall make a photo copy of a 16buyer's or transferee's valid photo identification card 17whenever a firearm sale transaction takes place. The photo 18copy shall be attached to the documentation detailing the 19record of sale.20    (b) A certified licensee shall post in a conspicuous 21position on the premises where the licensee conducts business 22a sign that contains the following warning in block letters 23not less than one inch in height:24        "With few exceptions enumerated in the Firearm Owners   HB5320- 11 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1    Identification Card Act, it is unlawful for you to:2            (A) store or leave an unsecured firearm in a place 3        where a child can obtain access to it; 4            (B) sell or transfer your firearm to someone else 5        without receiving approval for the transfer from the 6        Illinois State Police, or7            (C) fail to report the loss or theft of your 8        firearm to local law enforcement within 48 hours.".9This sign shall be created by the Illinois State Police and 10made available for printing or downloading from the Illinois 11State Police's website.12    (c) No retail location established after the effective 13date of this Act shall be located within 500 feet of any 14school, pre-school, or day care facility in existence at its 15location before the retail location is established as measured 16from the nearest corner of the building holding the retail 17location to the corner of the school, pre-school, or day care 18facility building nearest the retail location at the time the 19retail location seeks licensure.20    (d) A certified dealer who sells or transfers a firearm 21shall provide notify the purchaser or the recipient, orally 22and in writing, in both English and Spanish, at the time of 23application for a firearm purchase, all of the following 24information to increase awareness about the risks posed by 25firearms in the home and State laws regarding firearm 26ownership:  HB5320- 12 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1        (1) Firearm ownership risk education, including the 2    following information:3            (A) firearm ownership increases the risk of 4        suicide by 3 times;5            (B) firearm ownership increases the risk of 6        suicide for children and teens by 4 times;7            (C) firearm ownership increases the likelihood of 8        homicide by 2 times;9            (D) firearm ownership increases the risk of 10        intimate partner homicide for women in abusive 11        relationships by 5 times; and12            (E) firearms are the leading cause of death for 13        children and teens.14        (2) Safe secure storage, which shall state that State 15    law requires firearms to be placed in a securely locked 16    box or container and not in a location believed to be 17    secure from children, anyone prohibited from having a 18    firearm, or persons at-risk of harming themselves or 19    others.20        (3) Reporting lost or stolen firearms, which shall 21    state that State law requires the sale or transfer, that 22    the owner of a firearm is required to report a lost or 23    stolen firearm to local law enforcement within 48 hours 24    after the owner first discovers the loss or theft. 25    The Illinois State Police shall create the a written 26notice, in both English and Spanish, that certified dealers   HB5320- 13 -LRB104 18208 LNS 31647 b1shall provide firearm purchasers or transferees in accordance 2with this provision and make such notice available for 3printing or downloading from the Illinois State Police 4website. 5(Source: P.A. 104-31, eff. 1-1-26.)